Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.360

Students in out-of-home care—School districts and the department of children, youth, and families collaboration.

School districts must collaborate with the department of children, youth, and families as provided in RCW 74.13.560.

[ 2018 c 139 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 139: See note following RCW 28A.225.350.